en: Trophies
xx: Trophies
cs: Trofeje
da: Trofæer
de: Trophäen
es: Trofeos
fr: Trophées
it: Trofei
ja: トロフィー
nl: Trofeeën
no: Premieprodukter
pl: Trofea
pt: Troféus
ru: Трофеи
sv: Troféer
tr: Kupalar

en: Vehicles & Parts
xx: Vehicles & Parts
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly
da: Køretøjer og dele
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile
es: Vehículos y recambios
fr: Véhicules et accessoires
it: Veicoli e parti
ja: 乗り物・パーツ
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen
no: Kjøretøy og deler
pl: Pojazdy i części
pt: Veículos e peças
ru: Транспортные средства и запчасти
sv: Fordon och delar
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar

en: Vehicle Parts & Accessories
xx: Vehicle Parts & Accessories
cs: Díly a příslušenství vozidel
da: Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer
de: Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör
es: Piezas y accesorios para vehículos
fr: Pièces détachées pour véhicules
it: Componenti e accessori per auto
ja: 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品
nl: Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires
no: Tilbehør til kjøretøydeler
pl: Akcesoria i części do pojazdów
pt: Peças e acessórios de veículos
ru: Автомобильные детали и принадлежности
sv: Fordonsdelar och tillbehör
tr: Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar

en: Aircraft Parts & Accessories
xx: Aircraft Parts & Accessories
cs: Součásti a příslušenství letadel
da: Dele og tilbehør til fly
de: Flugzeugteile & -Zubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas para aviones
fr: Pièces et accessoires pour avions
it: Componenti e accessori per velivoli
ja: 航空機パーツ・関連用品
nl: Vliegtuigonderdelen en -accessoires
no: Deler og tilbehør til fly
pl: Akcesoria i części do samolotów
pt: Peças e acessórios de aeronaves
ru: Детали и принадлежности для воздушных судов
sv: Delar och tillbehör till flygplan
tr: Hava Taşıtı Parçaları ve Aksesuarları

en: Motor Vehicle Electronics
xx: Motor Vehicle Electronics
cs: Elektronika vozidel
da: Elektronik til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Elektronik
es: Material electrónico para vehículos motorizados
fr: Électronique pour véhicules
it: Elettronica per veicoli a motore
ja: 車載用電子機器
nl: Elektronica voor motorvoertuigen
no: Elektronikk for motorkjøretøy
pl: Wyposażenie elektroniczne pojazdów silnikowych
pt: Eletrônicos para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильная электроника
sv: Fordonselektronik
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Elektronik Sistemleri

en: Motor Vehicle A/V Players & In-Dash Systems
xx: Motor Vehicle A/V Players & In-Dash Systems
cs: Hudební a video přehrávače do motorových vozidel a palubní počítače
da: A/V-afspillere og integrerede systemer i motorkøretøjer
de: A/V-Player & im Armaturenbrett integrierte Systeme für Autos
es: Sistemas de entretenimiento a bordo y reproductores AV para vehículos
fr: Lecteurs et systèmes audio et vidéo intégrés pour véhicules, Autoradio
it: Sistemi da cruscotto e lettori audio/video per auto
ja: カーオーディオ・インダッシュシステム
nl: Inbouw-audio- en videospelers voor motorvoertuigen
no: Audiovisuelle spillere og dashbordsystemer
pl: Samochodowe odtwarzacze AV i systemy do montażu w desce rozdzielczej
pt: Sistemas embutidos e players A/V para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные развлекательные системы
sv: A/V-spelare och inbyggda system för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç A/V Oynatıcıları ve Ekranlı Teyp Sistemleri

en: Motor Vehicle Amplifiers
xx: Motor Vehicle Amplifiers
cs: Zesilovače do vozidel
da: Forstærkere til motorkøretøjer
de: Audioverstärker für Autos
es: Amplificadores para automóviles
fr: Amplificateurs pour véhicules
it: Amplificatori per veicoli
ja: 車載用アンプ
nl: Versterkers voor motorvoertuigen
no: Forsterkere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Wzmacniacze samochodowe
pt: Amplificadores de áudio para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные усилители
sv: Förstärkare till motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Amfileri

en: Motor Vehicle Cassette Adapters
xx: Motor Vehicle Cassette Adapters
cs: Kazetové adaptéry do vozidel
da: Kassettebåndsadaptere til motorkøretøjer
de: Kassettenadapter
es: Adaptadores de casetes para automóviles
fr: Adaptateurs de cassettes pour véhicules
it: Adattatori a cassetta per veicoli
ja: 車載用カセットアダプター
nl: Cassetteadapters voor motorvoertuigen
no: Kassettadaptere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Adaptery kasetowe
pt: Adaptadores para fita cassete para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные кассетные адаптеры
sv: Kassettadaptrar för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Kaset Adaptörleri

en: Motor Vehicle Cassette Players
xx: Motor Vehicle Cassette Players
cs: Kazetové přehrávače do vozidel
da: Kassettebåndsafspillere til motorkøretøjer
de: Kassettenspieler für Autos
es: Radiocasetes para automóviles
fr: Lecteurs de cassettes pour véhicules
it: Mangianastri per veicoli
ja: 車載用カセットプレーヤー
nl: Cassettespelers voor motorvoertuigen
no: Kassettspillere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Odtwarzacze kasetowe
pt: Toca-fitas para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные кассетные проигрыватели
sv: Kassettspelare för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Kaset Çalarları

en: Motor Vehicle Equalizers & Crossovers
xx: Motor Vehicle Equalizers & Crossovers
cs: Ekvalizéry a výhybky do vozidel
da: Equalizere og crossovere til motorkøretøjer
de: Equalizer & Frequenzweichen für Autos
es: Crossovers y ecualizadores para coches
fr: Égaliseurs et répartiteurs pour véhicules
it: Equalizzatori e crossover per veicoli
ja: 車載用イコライザー・クロスオーバー
nl: Equalizers en cross-overs voor motorvoertuigen
no: Utjevnere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Korektory i zwrotnice
pt: Equalizadores e crossovers para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные эквалайзеры и кроссоверы
sv: Equalizers och crossovers för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Ekolayzırları ve Crossover'ları

en: Motor Vehicle Parking Cameras
xx: Motor Vehicle Parking Cameras
cs: Parkovací kamery pro motorová vozidla
da: Parkeringskameraer til motorkøretøjer
de: Parkkameras für Autos
es: Cámaras de seguridad para automóviles
fr: Caméras de recul
it: Telecamere di parcheggio per veicoli
ja: 車載用バックカメラ
nl: Parkeercamera's voor motorvoertuigen
no: Parkeringskameraer til motorkjøretøy
pl: Kamery parkowania
pt: Câmeras de estacionamento para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные парковочные камеры
sv: Säkerhetskameror för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Güvenlik Kameraları

en: Motor Vehicle Speakerphones
xx: Motor Vehicle Speakerphones
cs: Soupravy handsfree do vozidel
da: Højttalertelefoner til motorkøretøjer
de: Freisprechanlagen
es: Manos libres para automóviles
fr: Kits mains-libres pour véhicules
it: Vivavoce per auto
ja: 車載用スピーカーフォン
nl: Luidsprekertelefoons voor motorvoertuigen
no: Høyttalertelefoner til motorkjøretøy
pl: Zestawy głośnomówiące
pt: Aparelho de viva-voz para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные комплекты громкой связи
sv: Högtalartelefoner för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Mikrofonlu Kulaklıkları

en: Motor Vehicle Speakers
xx: Motor Vehicle Speakers
cs: Reproduktory do vozidel
da: Højttalere til motorkøretøjer
de: Lautsprecher für Autos
es: Altavoces para automóviles
fr: Haut-parleurs pour véhicules
it: Altoparlanti per veicoli
ja: 車載用スピーカー
nl: Luidsprekers voor motorvoertuigen
no: Høyttalere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Głośniki samochodowe
pt: Alto-falantes para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные динамики
sv: Högtalare till motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Hoparlörleri

en: Motor Vehicle Subwoofers
xx: Motor Vehicle Subwoofers
cs: Subwoofery do vozidel
da: Subwoofere til motorkøretøjer
de: Subwoofer für Autos
es: Altavoz de subwoofer para automóviles
fr: Caissons de basse pour véhicules
it: Subwoofer per veicoli
ja: 車載用サブウーファー
nl: Subwoofers voor motorvoertuigen
no: Subwoofere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Subwoofery
pt: Subwoofers para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные сабвуферы
sv: Subwoofers för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Subwoofer'ları

en: Motor Vehicle Video Monitor Mounts
xx: Motor Vehicle Video Monitor Mounts
cs: Držáky monitorů do vozidel
da: Holdere til montering af videoskærme i motorkøretøjer
de: Halterungen für Kfz-Videomonitore
es: Soportes para monitores de vídeo para vehículos motorizados
fr: Supports d'écrans vidéo pour véhicules
it: Staffe per monitor video per veicoli a motore
ja: 車載用ビデオモニタースタンド
nl: Videomonitorsteunen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Monteringsdeler til videoskjermer i motorkjøretøy
pl: Mocowania do samochodowych monitorów wideo
pt: Suportes de monitor de vídeo para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные кронштейны для мониторов
sv: Monteringssatser för videoskärmar
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Video Monitörü Tutacakları

en: Motor Vehicle Parts
xx: Motor Vehicle Parts
cs: Díly motorových vozidel
da: Dele til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Teile
es: Piezas para vehículos motorizados
fr: Pièces détachées automobiles et motos
it: Componenti per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用パーツ
nl: Motorvoertuigonderdelen
no: Deler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Części do pojazdów silnikowych
pt: Peças para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные запчасти
sv: Fordonsdelar
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Parçaları

en: Motor Vehicle Braking
xx: Motor Vehicle Braking
cs: Brzdy motorových vozidel
da: Bremsedele til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Bremsen
es: Frenos para vehículos motorizados
fr: Système de freinage
it: Freni per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用ブレーキ
nl: Remmen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Bremser til motorkjøretøyer
pl: Układy hamulcowe
pt: Freios para veículos motorizados
ru: Тормозные системы для автомобилей
sv: Bromsar för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Freni

en: Motor Vehicle Carpet & Upholstery
xx: Motor Vehicle Carpet & Upholstery
cs: Koberce a čalounění vozidel
da: Måtter og sæder til motorkøretøjer
de: Bodenbeläge & Polster
es: Tapicería y alfombrillas para vehículos motorizados
fr: Housses et tapis pour véhicules
it: Tappetini e rivestimenti per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車内装用ファブリック
nl: Vloerbedekking en bekleding voor motorvoertuigen
no: Tepper og møbeltrekk til motorkjøretøy
pl: Wykładziny i tapicerka
pt: Tapetes e estofados para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные коврики и обивка салона
sv: Bilmattor och bilklädsel
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Halı ve Döşemesi

en: Motor Vehicle Climate Control
xx: Motor Vehicle Climate Control
cs: Klimatizace a ventilace pro vozidla
da: Klimanlæg til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Klimatisierung
es: Control de climatización de vehículos motorizados
fr: Régulation de la climatisation
it: Climatizzatori per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車用エアコン
nl: Klimaatbeheersing voor motorvoertuigen
no: Klimaanlegg for motorkjøretøy
pl: Układy chłodzenia
pt: Controle de temperatura de veículos
ru: Автомобильные системы климат-контроля
sv: Klimatkontroll för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Klimaları

en: Motor Vehicle Controls
xx: Motor Vehicle Controls
cs: Ovládací prvky vozidel
da: Styrefunktioner til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Steuerelemente
es: Controles de vehículos motorizados
fr: Commandes pour véhicules
it: Controlli per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用制御装置
nl: Bediening van motorvoertuigen
no: Kontrollmekanismer for motorkjøretøy
pl: Elementy układu kierowniczego
pt: Controles para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные средства управления
sv: Fordonskontrolldelar
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Kumandaları